Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-203
Advertising, defined.

Advertising shall mean the commercial use of media forms used to make consumers aware of or familiar with the supplier's trademark, trade name, logo, slogan, colors, signs, or product. The term media forms shall include, but not be limited to, television, radio, newspaper, billboards, and point-of-sale signs produced by the supplier for use by the wholesaler. The terms promote, promotional, promotion, market, and marketing shall be considered separate and distinct from advertising in meaning and application.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 3.